Utah statutes.
53B-22-103.   Weber State University revenue bonds -- Student services
building.
(1)  The State Board of Regents, on behalf of Weber State University, may
issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of
Weber State University to borrow money on the credit of the income and
revenues of Weber State University, other than appropriations of the
Legislature, to finance the partial cost of constructing, furnishing, and
equipping a student services building.
(2)  The bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this section
may not exceed $5,800,000 and shall be issued in accordance with Title 53B,
Chapter 21, Revenue Bonds, under such terms and conditions and in such amounts
as the board, by resolution, determines are reasonable and necessary.
